Utah statutes.
62A-11-104.1.   Disclosure of information regarding employees.
(1)  Upon request by the office, for purposes of an official investigation
made in connection with its duties under Section 62A-11-104, the following
disclosures shall be made to the office:
(a)  a public or private employer shall disclose an employee's name, address,
date of birth, income, social security number, and health insurance
information pertaining to the employee and the employee's dependents;
(b)  an insurance organization subject to Title 31A, Insurance Code, or the
insurance administrators of a self-insured employer shall disclose health
insurance information pertaining to an insured or an insured's dependents, if
known; and
(c)  a financial institution subject to Title 7, Financial Institutions, shall
disclose financial record information of a customer named in the request.
(2)  The office shall specify by rule the type of health insurance and
financial record information required to be disclosed under this section.
(3)  All information received under this section is subject to Title 63G,
Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
(4)  An employer, financial institution, or insurance organization, or its
agent or employee, is not civilly or criminally liable for providing
information to the office in accordance with this section, whether the
information is provided pursuant to oral or written request.
